Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5915.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-15-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-15 entitled "Actions by
and Against Towns" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-15-8. Recovery against town for damages from neglect to maintain highway or
bridge.
(a) If any person receives or suffers bodily injury or damage to that person’s property by
reason of defect, want of repair, or insufficient railing, in or upon a public highway, causeway, or
bridge, in any town which is by law obliged to repair and keep the same in a condition safe and
convenient for travelers with their vehicles, which injury or damage might have been prevented by
reasonable care and diligence on the part of the town, the person may recover, in the manner
provided in this chapter, from the town, the amount of damages, sustained by the aggrieved person,
if the town had reasonable notice of the defect, or might have had notice of the defect by the exercise
of proper care and diligence on its part.
(b) This cause of action is exempt from the provisions of chapter 31 of title 9.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001960
========